Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Chapter 8

Security Gates and Barriers

13-8-101. Applicability of chapter.

This chapter shall apply to any gated facility or community, whether residential, commercial or industrial, approved for or constructed after May 22, 2008, and the installation of any new or replacement security gate or barrier at any existing gated facility or community after May 22, 2008.

Acts 2008, ch. 1008, § 2.

13-8-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Access road” means a vehicular access roadway greater than or equal to twenty-four feet (24') in width;

“Authority” means a governing body identified in § 13-8-103;

“Driveway” means a vehicular access roadway less than twenty-four feet (24') in width and serving no more than two (2) single-family dwellings;

“Gated facility or community” means a multifamily residential property or commercial or industrial development or compound that has a security gate or barrier to block the entrance to the facility or community from a public street to a private street, parking lot or driveway of the facility or community;

“Radio operated controller” means a device used to operate a security gate or barrier that is equipped with a radio receiver capable of receiving signals from a police department, sheriff's department, if the gated facility or community is in the county, fire department, utility and emergency medical services' radio transceivers that allow emergency responders and other necessary on-duty employees to open the security gate or barrier or blocking device by use of the equipment; and

“Security gate or barrier” means a gate or barrier, electrically operated, that controls the passage of authorized vehicles and persons from a public street to access roads, driveways or parking lots of the gated facility or community.

Acts 2008, ch. 1008, § 3.

13-8-103. Review of plans for installation or replacement of security gates or barriers.

The following authorities, as applicable, shall be responsible for reviewing all plans for the installation or replacement of security gates or barriers at gated facilities or communities to ensure that each gated facility or community complies with this chapter:

The regional planning commission, created pursuant to chapter 3 of this title;

The municipal planning commission designated as a regional planning commission, created pursuant to chapter 3 of this title;

A community planning commission, created pursuant to chapter 3 of this title;

The municipal planning commission, created pursuant to chapter 4 of this title;

County or municipal zoning boards, created pursuant to chapter 7 of this title; and

The county or municipal legislative body if none of the agencies identified in subdivisions (1)-(5) has been created within the county or municipality, as applicable; provided, that the legislative bodies shall identify an official to review all plans for the installation or replacement of security gates or barriers at gated facilities or communities within their jurisdictions for compliance with this chapter and report the findings of the official to the legislative body for its action.

Acts 2008, ch. 1008, § 4.

13-8-104. Issuance of permit — Inspections.

After May 22, 2008, prior to the installation or replacement of a security gate or barrier at a gated facility or community, the developer or owner shall obtain a security gate or barrier permit from the authority having jurisdiction in the area where the security gate or barrier is to be replaced or installed. A permit shall only be issued for a security gate or barrier meeting the requirements of this chapter. Prior to any changes, alterations or blocking of private streets, plans detailing the change accompanied by drawings, shall be submitted to the authority having jurisdiction over the gated facility or community for approval. A county or municipal building or codes inspector shall inspect all such installations. The inspections of security gates or barriers shall be conducted at the same time as other inspections of the gated facility or community are performed by a county or municipal building or codes inspector.

Acts 2008, ch. 1008, § 5.

13-8-105. Equipment required at security gates or barriers — Policies.

All security gates or barriers shall be equipped with a radio operated receiver/controller capable of receiving signals from a police department, sheriff's department, if the gated facility or community is in the county, fire department, utility and emergency medical services' radio transceivers serving the gated facility or community that allow emergency responders and other necessary on-duty employees to open the security gate or barrier by use of the equipment.

All security gates or barriers must meet policies deemed necessary by the authority having jurisdiction over the gated facility or community for rapid, reliable, and mutual aid access.

The equipment shall be furnished, installed and maintained by the gated facility or community that is served by the equipment.

Acts 2008, ch. 1008, § 6.

13-8-106. Maintenance and upkeep of security gate or barrier.

The maintenance and upkeep of any security gate or barrier shall be the sole responsibility of the developer, owner or any duly incorporated and active association having jurisdiction of the gated facility or community.

Inoperative security gates or barriers shall be repaired immediately. Inoperative gates shall be locked in the open position until repairs are made. Abandoned gates shall be permanently locked in the open position.

Acts 2008, ch. 1008, § 7.

13-8-107. Liability.

The party or parties controlling the operation and maintenance of the security gate or barrier shall be liable for any damages caused by the improper operation of the security gate or barrier.

Acts 2008, ch. 1008, § 8.